Hawaii statutes.
[§195‑12] Kaena point natural area
reserve; vehicular access prohibited. (a) The use of any vehicle within
or traversing the Kaena point natural area reserve is prohibited, except as
provided in this section. Any violation of this section shall be subject to
section 195-8.

(b) The department may adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 to allow a limited number of persons vehicular access to the Kaena
point natural area reserve for department-permitted fishing and camping
activities.

(c) This prohibition shall not apply to:

(1) Vehicles operated by personnel or agents of the
department of land and natural resources necessary for the management and
maintenance of the Kaena point natural area reserve and its resources; and

(2) Emergency vehicles, including emergency medical
ambulances, police department vehicles, and fire department vehicles.

(d) For purposes of this section,
"vehicle" means every motorized device in, upon, or by which any
person or property is or may be transported or drawn, including all-terrain
vehicles and mopeds. [L 2006, c 89, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next